Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4173.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Oregon Government Ethics Commission shall study public meetings.
The commission shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to the judiciary no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 176